Utah statutes.
41-1a-1010.   Permit required to dismantle vehicle -- Duties upon receiving the permit -- Exceptions.

(1) (a)  A person may not scrap, dismantle, destroy, or otherwise change any vehicle so that it loses its character, until the person submits to the division:

(i)  the certificate of title for the vehicle for cancellation; and

(ii)  an application for a permit to dismantle the vehicle.

(b)  Upon approval of the application, the division shall issue a permit to dismantle the vehicle.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), if a permit to dismantle is issued under this section, the vehicle shall be destroyed and may not be rebuilt or reconstructed and may not be retitled or registered.

(3)  A vehicle for which a permit to dismantle has been issued by the division may be retitled and the permit to dismantle rescinded if:

(a)  prior to receiving a dismantling permit the vehicle had a Utah certificate of title;

(b)  the vehicle has not been dismantled;

(c)  an investigator for the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division of the commission determines after a physical inspection of the vehicle that it is the same vehicle for which the permit to dismantle was issued; and

(d)  the applicant pays the fee under Subsection (4).

(4)  The commission may collect a fee established in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 to cover the expenses of an inspection under Subsection (3).

